Hawaii statutes.
§490:2-508 Cure by seller of improper
tender or delivery; replacement. (1) Where any tender or delivery by the
seller is rejected because nonconforming and the time for performance has not
yet expired, the seller may seasonably notify the buyer of his intention to
cure and may then within the contract time make a conforming delivery.

(2) Where the buyer rejects a nonconforming
tender which the seller had reasonable grounds to believe would be acceptable
with or without money allowance the seller may if he seasonably notifies the
buyer have a further reasonable time to substitute a conforming tender. [L
1965, c 208, §2-508; HRS §490:2-508]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next